New Jersey, session 222, A1152.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The following item in section 1 of P.L.2023, c.74, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2024, is amended to read as follows: 16 DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILIES 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 55 Social Services Programs 1630 Division of Family and Community Partnerships GRANTS-IN-AID 03-1630  Family and Community Partnerships [$162,418,000]$163,918,000 Total Grants-in-Aid appropriation, Social Services Programs .. [$162,418,000]$163,918,000 Grants-in-Aid: 03    Center for Great Expectations [($500,000)]($2,000,000) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.